Massachusetts, session 194th, S1690.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 21 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby repealed. 
SECTION 2. Section 22 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby repealed.  
SECTION 3. Subsection (b) of section 34 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby 
amended by deleting the following words:- “and large capacity feeding devices”. 
SECTION 4. Subsection (c) of section 34 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby 
amended by deleting clause (iii) and (iv). 
SECTION 5. Subsection (a) of section 49 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby 
amended by deleting the following words:- “The license shall not entitle a holder thereof to 
transfer, possess or carry large capacity feeding devices or assault-style firearms unless such 
transfer, possession or carry is permitted under section 131M.”  
SECTION 6. Section 63 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby repealed. 

of 2 12  SECTION 7. Section 71 of Chapter 135 of the Acts of 2024 is hereby repealed.